District of Columbia statutes.
3-342.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term “Baseball Stadium” shall have the same meaning as that provided for the term “Ballpark” in § 47-2002.05(a)(1)(A).

History

Nov. 3, 1977, D.C. Law 2-37, § 3a
as added June 5, 2008, D.C. Law 17-169, § 2(a), 55 DCR 5183
Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-233, § 201(a), 62 DCR 438

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-233 would have rewritten this section.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 201(a) of the Soccer Stadium Development Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-557, Dec. 30, 2014, 62 DCR 448, 20 STAT 4467).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-233: Section 301 of D.C. Law 20-233 provided (1) that the act shall apply upon the date of inclusions of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan; (2) that the Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council of the certification; and (3) that the Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in the District of Columbia Register and that the date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the applicability of the act.